Hawaii statutes.
§279A-4 Statewide transportation council;
establishment. To assist and advise the state department of transportation
in the development of the statewide transportation plan there is hereby
established a statewide transportation council consisting of fourteen members.
The members of the council shall be the directors of the state department of
transportation, the state department of business, economic development, and
tourism, the state department of health, the state office of environmental
quality control, and the office of planning, the chairperson of the board of
agriculture, the planning directors of each of the four counties, and the
transportation directors of each of the four counties. The members may be
represented at council meetings by their designated alternates. The director
of the state department of transportation shall submit recommendations to the
council for additional ex officio nonvoting members who, upon the majority vote
of the council, shall be invited to serve.

The department of transportation shall furnish
staff support to the council; such staff may be exempt from chapter 76. The
director of transportation shall be the chairperson of the council. All
decisions of the council shall be by majority vote unless otherwise provided.
[L 1975, c 179, §4; am L 1979, c 25, §1; am L 1987, c 336, §5; am L 1990, c
293, §8; gen ch 1993; am L 1996, c 299, §3; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next